California, session 20252026, AB2765.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Federal House Resolution H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), known as the “One Big Beautiful Bill Act,” which was passed on a partisan vote with all but two Republicans in the United States House of Representatives and three Republicans in the United States Senate voting “Yea” and all Democrats voting “Nay,” made the largest cuts to the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), known as CalFresh in California, in history.(b) HR H.R. 1 made these cuts to help fund the largest tax cuts for wealthy corporations and individuals in history.(c) These cuts are currently being enacted during a period of significant food inflation, caused in part by raids by the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) on immigrant farmworkers and trade tariffs levied unilaterally by President Donald J. Trump.(d) Among these cuts were cuts to food assistance for foster youth and families with children.(e) According to HR H.R. 1, the cuts to foster youth and families with dependent children are generally applied if the household fails to show proof of adequate work for adults in the household between 18 and 64 years of age, inclusive, despite the fact that there is no evidence that people are more able to find and keep work if they are experiencing hunger or their children are experiencing hunger.(f) The Legislature refuses to comply with the deception of HR H.R. 1, which dishonestly designated these new benefit cuts to families with children to be implemented under the “Able-Bodied Adult Without Dependents (ABAWD)” policy. The Legislature therefore plans to amend state law to accurately account for the harm caused to families with children as a result of the new federal law.(g) The Legislature declares that no one should experience hunger, especially not children and not foster youth transitioning to adulthood.(h) The Legislature recognizes the significant and long-term harm that can be caused by hunger experienced by children and young adults, especially those who experienced other traumas as a child, such as those known to have been experienced by foster youth.(i) The Legislature encourages all efforts to reduce the number of children and foster youth harmed by this cruel new federal policy.SEC. 2. Section 11450 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as amended by Section 2 of Chapter 798 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:11450. (a) (1) (A)    Aid shall be paid for each needy family, which shall include all eligible children of each eligible applicant or recipient child and the parents of the children, but shall not include a fetus, or recipients of aid under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), qualified for aid under this chapter. In determining the amount of aid paid, and notwithstanding the minimum basic standards of adequate care specified in Section 11452, the family’s income, exclusive of any amounts considered exempt as income or paid pursuant to subdivision (e) or Section 11453.1, determined for the prospective semiannual period pursuant to Sections 11265.1, 11265.2, and 11265.3, and then calculated pursuant to Section 11451.5, shall be deducted from the sum specified in the following table, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases pursuant to Section 11453 and paragraph (2). In no case shall the amount of aid paid for each month exceed the sum specified in the following table, as adjusted for cost-of-living increases pursuant to Section 11453 and paragraph (2), plus any special needs, as specified in subdivisions (c), (e), and (f):Number of eligible needypersons inthe same homeMaximumaid 1 ........................ $  326 2 ........................ 535 3 ........................ 663 4 ........................ 788 5 ........................ 899 6 ........................ 1,010 7 ........................ 1,109 8 ........................ 1,209 9 ........................ 1,30610 or more ........................ 1,403(B) If, when, and during those times that the United States government increases or decreases its contributions in assistance of needy children in this state above or below the amount paid on July 1, 1972, the amounts specified in the above table shall be increased or decreased by an amount equal to that increase or decrease by the United States government, provided that no increase or decrease shall be subject to subsequent adjustment pursuant to Section 11453.(2) The sums specified in paragraph (1) shall not be adjusted for cost of living for the 1990–91, 1991–92, 1992–93, 1993–94, 1994–95, 1995–96, 1996–97, and 1997–98 fiscal years, and through October 31, 1998, nor shall that amount be included in the base for calculating any cost-of-living increases for any fiscal year thereafter. Elimination of the cost-of-living adjustment pursuant to this paragraph shall satisfy the requirements of former Section 11453.05, and no further reduction shall be made pursuant to that section.(b) (1) (A) Until the date that paragraph (2) is effective, if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant child who is 18 years of age or younger at any time after verification of pregnancy, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant child and the child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy shall be required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), and until the date that paragraph (2) is effective, if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant person for the month in which the birth is anticipated and for the six-month period immediately prior to the month in which the birth is anticipated, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy is required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the family does not include a needy child qualified for aid under this chapter, aid shall be paid to a pregnant person as of the date of the application for aid, in the amount that would otherwise be paid to one person, as specified in subdivision (a), if the pregnant person or the child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. Verification of pregnancy shall be required as a condition of eligibility for aid under this paragraph.(B) A pregnant person may provide verification of pregnancy as required in subparagraph (A) by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for benefits to continue. If the applicant fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue aid when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.(C) (i) A person who receives aid pursuant to this paragraph shall report to the county, orally or in writing, within 30 days following the end of their pregnancy.(ii) Aid for persons under this paragraph shall discontinue at the end of the month following the month in which the person reports the end of their pregnancy to the county human services agency.(iii) Prior to discontinuing aid for a person under this paragraph due to the end of their pregnancy, the county human services agency shall provide information about, and referral to, mental health services, including, but not limited to, services provided by the county human services agency, when appropriate.(D) This paragraph shall take effect on July 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later.(c) (1) The amount of forty-seven dollars ($47) per month shall be paid to a pregnant person qualified for aid under subdivision (a) or (b) to meet the special needs resulting from pregnancy if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter. The county human services agency shall require a pregnant person to provide medical verification of pregnancy. The county human services agency shall refer all recipients of aid under this subdivision to a local provider of the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children, and perinatal home visiting services administered by the county public health agency, county human services agency, or applicable county home visiting provider. If that payment to a pregnant person qualified for aid under subdivision (a) is considered income under federal law in the first five months of pregnancy, payments under this subdivision do not apply to a person eligible under subdivision (a), except for the month in which birth is anticipated and for the three-month period immediately prior to the month in which delivery is anticipated, if the pregnant person and child, if born, would have qualified for aid under this chapter.(2) A pregnant person may provide the verification of pregnancy required by paragraph (1) by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for the pregnancy special need benefit to continue. If the pregnant person fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue the benefit when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.(3) Beginning May 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, the special needs payment described in paragraph (1) shall be one hundred dollars ($100) per month.(4) Beginning July 1, 2022, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, the special needs payment described in this subdivision shall discontinue at the end of the month following the month in which a person reports the end of their pregnancy to the county human services agency.(d) For children receiving AFDC-FC under this chapter, there shall be paid, exclusive of any amount considered exempt as income, an amount of aid each month that, if added to the child’s income, is equal to the rate specified in Section 11460, 11461, 11462, or 11463. In addition, the child is eligible for special needs, as specified in departmental regulations.(e) (1) In addition to the amounts payable under subdivision (a) and former Section 11453.1, a family is entitled to receive an allowance for recurring special needs not common to a majority of recipients. These recurring special needs include, but are not limited to, special diets upon the recommendation of a physician for circumstances other than pregnancy, and unusual costs of transportation, laundry, housekeeping services, telephone, and utilities. The recurring special needs allowance for each family per month shall not exceed that amount resulting from multiplying the sum of fifteen dollars ($15) by the number of recipients in the family who are eligible for assistance.(2)Subject to the department’s discretion to establish a mechanism implementing this paragraph, a household that receives aid under any provision of the Welfare and Institutions Code and that is also eligible for aid under this chapter, regardless of whether the household receives aid under this chapter, may receive a recurring special needs allowance, as described in paragraph (1), in order to prevent immediate child suffering and long-term harm caused by prolonged periods of childhood hunger or other unmet needs that will result from federal House Resolution 1 (Public Law 119-21), signed by United States President Donald J. Trump on July 4, 2025, if unmitigated.(3)Subject to the department’s discretion to establish a mechanism implementing this paragraph, the recurring special needs allowance described in paragraph (1) or (2) may be provided instead in the form of a food benefit that is equivalent in value to the allowance described in paragraph (1) or (2).(2) (A) In addition to any amounts payable under paragraph (1), an adult who is a member of a household that is aided by the CalFresh or CalWORKs program and that includes a child 14 years of age or older and under 18 years of age, and who is discontinued as a result of the three-month time limit on federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) aid newly applied to households with children under federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), signed by United States President Donald J. Trump on July 4, 2025, is entitled to receive a separate recurring special needs allowance pursuant to this paragraph.(B) The amount of the special needs allowance shall be a standard amount determined by the department to be adequate to respond to, and prevent hunger resulting from, the loss of federal SNAP benefits caused by Public Law 119-21.(C) To the extent that the department is unable to automate the special needs allowance benefit described in this paragraph by October 1, 2026, the amount for the first month of issuance for this benefit shall include the benefit for that month and for any qualifying previous months or partial months in which the benefit was not issued, provided the child or children described in subparagraph (A) remain eligible and continuously aided at the time of issuance.(D) The special needs allowance required to be issued pursuant to this paragraph shall be provided until at least October 1, 2027. The allowance shall continue to be provided until the funding, if appropriated in the Budget Act of 2026, to fund the allowance is exhausted, to the extent that the funding is not already exhausted by October 1, 2027.(E) The department has authority to adjust the mechanism or category of the payments described in this paragraph if the adjustment allows for earlier automation and issuance, so long as the resulting payments are consistent with the remainder of this paragraph.(f) (1) After a family has used all available liquid resources, both exempt and nonexempt, in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), with the exception of funds deposited in a restricted account described in subdivision (a) of Section 11155.2, the family is also entitled to receive an allowance for nonrecurring special needs. This paragraph does not apply to the allowance for nonrecurring special needs for homeless assistance pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).(2) An allowance for nonrecurring special needs shall be granted for replacement of clothing and household equipment and for emergency housing needs other than those needs addressed by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3). These needs shall be caused by sudden and unusual circumstances beyond the control of the needy family. The department shall establish the allowance for each of the nonrecurring special needs items. The sum of all nonrecurring special needs provided by this subdivision shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per event.(3) (A) (i) An allowance for nonrecurring special needs for homeless assistance is available to a family that is homeless and seeking shelter when the family is eligible for aid under this chapter.(ii) (I) Homeless assistance for temporary shelter is also available to families that are homeless and seeking shelter that are apparently eligible for aid under this chapter. Apparent eligibility exists when evidence presented by the applicant, or that is otherwise available to the county human services agency, and the information provided on the application documents indicate that there would be eligibility for aid under this chapter if the evidence and information were verified. However, a noncitizen applicant who does not provide verification of their eligible immigrant status, or a person with no eligible children who does not provide verification of their pregnancy, is not apparently eligible for purposes of this section.(II) A pregnant person may provide verification of pregnancy, as required in subclause (I), by means of a sworn statement or, if necessary, a verbal attestation. Medical verification of pregnancy shall be submitted within 30 working days following submission of the sworn statement or verbal attestation for benefits to continue. If the applicant fails to submit medical verification of pregnancy within 30 working days, the county human services agency shall continue aid when the applicant presents evidence of good faith efforts to comply with this requirement.(iii) Homeless assistance for temporary shelter is also available to families that are homeless and seeking shelter that would be eligible for aid under this chapter but for the fact that the only child or children in the family are in out-of-home placement pursuant to an order of the dependency court, if the family is receiving reunification services and the county determines that homeless assistance is necessary for reunification to occur.(B) A family is considered homeless, for the purpose of this section, when the family lacks a fixed and regular nighttime residence, the family has a primary nighttime residence that is a supervised publicly or privately operated shelter designed to provide temporary living accommodations, or the family is residing in a public or private place not designed for, or ordinarily used as, a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings. A family is also considered homeless for the purpose of this section if the family has received a notice to pay rent or quit, or any notice that could lead to an eviction, regardless of the circumstances cited in the notice.(4) (A) (i) A nonrecurring special needs benefit of eighty-five dollars ($85) a day shall be available to families of up to four members for the costs of temporary shelter, subject to the requirements of this paragraph. The fifth and additional members of the family shall each receive fifteen dollars ($15) per day, up to a daily maximum of one hundred forty-five dollars ($145). County human services agencies may increase the daily amount available for temporary shelter as necessary to secure the additional bedspace needed by the family.(ii) This special needs benefit shall be granted or denied the same day as the family’s application for homeless assistance, and benefits shall be available for up to three working days. Upon applying for homeless assistance, the family shall provide a sworn statement that the family is homeless. If the family meets the criteria of questionable homelessness, which means that there is reason to suspect that the family has permanent housing, the county human services agency shall refer the family to its early fraud prevention and detection unit, if the county has such a unit, for assistance in the verification of homelessness within this period.(iii) After homelessness has been verified, the three-day limit shall be extended for a period of time that, when added to the initial benefits provided, does not exceed a total of 16 calendar days. This extension of benefits shall be done in increments of one week, and shall be based upon searching for permanent housing, which shall be documented on a housing search form, good cause, or other circumstances defined by the department. Documentation of a housing search is required for the initial extension of benefits beyond the three-day limit and on a weekly basis thereafter if the family is receiving temporary shelter benefits. Good cause shall include, but is not limited to, situations in which the county human services agency has determined that the family, to the extent it is capable, has made a good faith but unsuccessful effort to secure permanent housing while receiving temporary shelter benefits or that the family is homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster.(iv) Notwithstanding clauses (ii) and (iii), the county may waive the three-day limit and may provide benefits in increments of more than one week for a family that becomes homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster.(B) (i) A nonrecurring special needs benefit for permanent housing assistance is available to pay for last month’s rent and security deposits if these payments are conditions of securing a residence, or to pay for up to two months of rent arrearages, if these payments are a reasonable condition of preventing eviction.(ii) The last month’s rent or monthly arrearage portion of the payment shall meet both of the following requirements:(I) (ia)  It shall not exceed 80 percent of the family’s total monthly household income without the value of CalFresh benefits or special needs benefit for a family of that size.(ib) Beginning January 1, 2026, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later, and for purposes of this subparagraph, the county human services agency shall include in the calculation of the family’s total monthly household income any amount that is regularly received or will be regularly received from other government and nonprofit housing and homeless subsidy programs and any regularly received private support intended or designed to help the family with housing, such as financial support from an individual outside the household. The additional sources of income described in the previous sentence shall not be included in the calculation of the family’s income for purposes of calculating the amount of aid paid pursuant to subdivision (a).(II) (ia)  It shall only be made to families that have found permanent housing costing no more than 80 percent of the family’s total monthly household income without the value of CalFresh benefits or special needs benefit for a family of that size.(ib) Beginning January 1, 2026, or on the date that the department notifies the Legislature that the California Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this paragraph, whichever date is later, and for purposes of this subparagraph, the county human services agency shall include in the calculation of the family’s total monthly household income any amount that is regularly received or will be regularly received from other government and nonprofit housing and homeless subsidy programs and any regularly received private support intended or designed to help the family with housing, such as financial support from an individual outside the household. The additional sources of income described in the previous sentence shall not be included in the calculation of the family’s income for purposes of calculating the amount of aid paid pursuant to subdivision (a).(iii) However, if the county human services agency determines that a family intends to reside with individuals who will be sharing housing costs, the county human services agency shall, in appropriate circumstances, set aside the condition specified in subclause (II) of clause (ii).(C) The nonrecurring special needs benefit for permanent housing assistance is also available to cover the standard costs of deposits for utilities that are necessary for the health and safety of the family.(D) A payment for, or denial of, permanent housing assistance shall be issued no later than one working day from the time that a family presents evidence of the availability of permanent housing. If an applicant family provides evidence of the availability of permanent housing before the county human services agency has established eligibility for aid under this chapter, the county human services agency shall complete the eligibility determination so that the payment for, or denial of, permanent housing assistance is issued within one working day from the submission of evidence of the availability of permanent housing, unless the family has failed to provide all of the verification necessary to establish eligibility for aid under this chapter.(E) (i) Except as provided in clauses (ii) and (iii), eligibility for the temporary shelter assistance and the permanent housing assistance pursuant to this paragraph is limited to the number of days allowable under subparagraph (A) for temporary shelter assistance and one payment of permanent housing assistance every 12 months. A person who applies for homeless assistance benefits shall be informed that, with certain exceptions, the temporary shelter benefit is limited to the number of days allowable under subparagraph (A) for the 12-month period.(ii) (I) A family that becomes homeless as a direct and primary result of a state or federally declared disaster is eligible for homeless assistance.(II) If there is a state or federally declared disaster in a county, the county human services agency shall coordinate with public and private disaster response organizations and agencies to identify and inform recipients of their eligibility for homeless assistance available pursuant to subclause (H).(iii) A family is eligible for homeless assistance if homelessness is a direct result of domestic violence by a spouse, partner, or roommate, including, but not limited to, a parent or child with whom they were living; physical or mental illness that is medically verified that shall not include a diagnosis of alcoholism, drug addiction, or psychological stress; or the uninhabitability of the former residence caused by sudden and unusual circumstances beyond the control of the family, including natural catastrophe, fire, or condemnation. These circumstances shall be verified by a third-party governmental or private health and human services agency, except that domestic violence may also be verified by a sworn statement by the victim, as provided under Section 11495.25. Homeless assistance payments based on these specific circumstances may not be received more often than once in any 12-month period. In addition, if the domestic violence is verified by a sworn statement by the victim, the homeless assistance payments shall be limited to two periods of not more than 16 cumulative calendar days of temporary shelter assistance and two payments of permanent housing assistance. A county may require that a recipient of homeless assistance benefits who qualifies under this paragraph for a second time in a 24-month period participate in a homelessness avoidance case plan as a condition of eligibility for homeless assistance benefits, but only if the county has also provided a housing navigation caseworker who can assist with securing permanent housing and housing case management services. The county human services agency shall immediately inform recipients who verify domestic violence by a sworn statement of the availability of domestic violence counseling and services, and refer those recipients to services upon request.(iv) If a county requires a recipient who verifies domestic violence by a sworn statement to participate in a homelessness avoidance case plan pursuant to clause (iii), the plan shall include the provision of domestic violence services, if appropriate.(v) If a recipient seeking homeless assistance based on domestic violence pursuant to clause (iii) has previously received homeless avoidance services based on domestic violence, the county shall review whether services were offered to the recipient and consider what additional services would assist the recipient in leaving the domestic violence situation.(vi) The county human services agency shall report necessary data to the department through a statewide homeless assistance payment indicator system, as requested by the department, regarding all recipients of aid under this paragraph.(F) Payments to providers for temporary shelter and permanent housing and utilities shall be made on behalf of families requesting these payments.(G) The daily amount for the temporary shelter special needs benefit for homeless assistance may be increased if authorized by the current year’s Budget Act by specifying a different daily allowance and appropriating the funds therefor.(H) A payment shall not be made pursuant to this paragraph unless the provider of housing is any of the following:(i) A commercial establishment.(ii) A shelter.(iii) A person with whom, or an establishment with which, the family requesting assistance has executed a valid lease, sublease, or shared housing agreement.(I) (i) A CalWORKs applicant who provides a sworn statement of past or present domestic abuse and who is fleeing their abuser is deemed to be homeless and is eligible for temporary shelter assistance under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) and under subparagraph (E), notwithstanding any income and assets attributable to the alleged abuser.(ii) The homeless assistance payments issued under this subparagraph shall be granted the same day as the family’s application, and benefits shall be available in increments of 16 days of temporary shelter assistance pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (A). The homeless assistance payments shall be limited to two periods of not more than 16 cumulative calendar days each of temporary shelter assistance within the applicant’s lifetime. The second 16-day period shall continue to be available when the applicant becomes a CalWORKs recipient during the first 16-day period. The homeless assistance payments issued under this subparagraph shall be in addition to other payments for which the CalWORKs applicant, if the applicant becomes a CalWORKs recipient, may later qualify under this subdivision.(iii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the housing search documentation described in clause (iii) of subparagraph (A) shall be required only upon issuance of an immediate need payment pursuant to Section 11266 or the issuance of benefits for the month of application.(g) The department shall establish rules and regulations ensuring the uniform statewide application of this section.(h) The department shall notify all applicants and recipients of aid through the standardized application form that these benefits are available and shall provide an opportunity for recipients to apply for the funds quickly and efficiently.(i) The department shall work with county human services agencies, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, and advocates of CalWORKs recipients to gather information regarding the actual costs of a nightly shelter and best practices for transitioning families from a temporary shelter to permanent housing, and to provide that information to the Legislature, to be submitted annually in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(j) (1) Except for the purposes of Section 15200, the amounts payable to recipients pursuant to Section 11453.1 shall not constitute part of the payment schedule set forth in subdivision (a).(2) The amounts payable to recipients pursuant to Section 11453.1 shall not constitute income to recipients of aid under this section.(k) For children receiving Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), there shall be paid, exclusive of any amount considered exempt as income, an amount of aid each month, which, when added to the child’s income, is equal to the rate specified in Sections 11364 and 11387.(l) (1) A county shall implement the semiannual reporting requirements in accordance with Chapter 501 of the Statutes of 2011 no later than October 1, 2013.(2) Upon completion of the implementation described in paragraph (1), each county shall provide a certificate to the director certifying that semiannual reporting has been implemented in the county.(3) Upon filing the certificate described in paragraph (2), a county shall comply with the semiannual reporting provisions of this section.(m) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may implement and administer this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.(2) The department shall adopt emergency regulations no later than 18 months following the completion of all necessary automation to implement this section. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section.(3) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted.(n) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024, or on the date the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement this section, whichever date is later.SEC. 3. Section 18900.96 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, immediately following Section 18900.95, to read:18900.96. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide direction to the state and the counties on maximizing efforts to retain in the CalFresh program as many recipients as possible as Public Law 119-21 is implemented. It is further the intent of the Legislature to provide for the continuation of food benefits for as many Californians as possible who might become ineligible for CalFresh benefits due to the implementation of Public Law 119-21.(b) The state and the counties shall implement the applicable Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP)-related provisions under Public Law 119-21 using all of the following steps:(1) Mitigate harm and minimize client impacts and discontinuances of benefits whenever possible.(2) Use data and research to inform decisions, monitor impacts, and make adjustments when necessary. This step includes, but is not limited to, data matching and flagging of cases to identify and exempt as many individuals who qualify for exemptions as possible.(3) Actively seek insight from people with lived experience and from partners representing a variety of local and state sectors.(4) Identify opportunities to improve existing processes in parallel with implementation efforts that center client and county user experience.(5) Subject to an appropriation made by the Legislature for this purpose, provide appropriate and adequate state funding and resources to the counties to administer the CalFresh program, provide case management, and properly screen recipients under the complex and challenging new changes set forth by Public Law 119-21.(c) (1) The department, in collaboration with other departments and the California Health and Human Services Agency, as necessary, shall adopt, provide instructions to counties on, and automate for, blanket exemptions to CalFresh work requirements, in accordance with federal law, for the following populations if eligible for the CalFresh program:(A) Individuals served under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)) by regional centers who qualify for an exemption to the CalFresh work requirements under Public Law 119-21 because they are medically certified as physically or mentally unfit for employment. The department shall not infringe on, or impede, the ability of individuals in this population who may be working to continue working.(B) Individuals who are recipients of the In-Home Supportive Services program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3) and their caregiver providers.(C) Individuals who are unfit for employment because they lack a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence.(D) Youth who currently have, or have previously had, an open child welfare or probation case and who are unfit for employment due to a documented behavioral or physical health condition as indicated in their case plan, medical billing claims data, or other appropriate documentation. This population includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:(i) Individuals participating in extended foster care pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403 who have been determined to have a medical condition that renders them incapable of engaging in school, employment, or other qualifying activities.(ii) Individuals who exited the foster care system, who were previously participating in the extended foster care program pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, and who were determined to have a medical condition while in foster care that rendered them incapable of engaging in school, employment, or other qualifying activities prior to exiting foster care.(iii) Individuals who exited foster care and are eligible to receive full-scope Medi-Cal benefits until 26 years of age, with a documented, qualifying medical condition.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be subject to subdivision (f) and shall be operative on the date when the department notifies the Legislature both that a process has been established to provide the data to the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) and that the necessary changes have been automated to implement paragraph (1).(d) All exemptions provided by the state and the counties under Public Law 119-21 shall, in accordance with federal law and guidance, remain in effect for any recipient until, at the earliest, the next scheduled redetermination for that recipient, when the exemption shall be reassessed by the county, unless the automated exemption at redetermination allows for the exemption to continue.(e) (1) The department shall provide data, on at least a monthly basis to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, commencing on December 15, 2026, and by every 15th day of each month thereafter, on the total number of CalFresh recipients subject to, exempted from, or discontinued from the program due to, the CalFresh work requirements under Public Law 119-21. The data shall be furnished to impacted counties with a minimum of four weeks for review prior to public reporting in order to ensure accuracy.(2) The data described in paragraph (1) shall also include as much detail as possible on the characteristics of the recipients losing CalFresh benefits, including, but not limited to, the nature of qualifying exemptions, the reasons for any discontinuances, and demographic data about the recipients subject to the time limit and the other individuals in their assistance unit. The data for the recipients and the other individuals in the assistance unit shall be reported both in the aggregate and discrete from one another in order to ensure that impacts are clearly understood at both the individual and household levels, and to explain the implementation of major new sources of administrative data supporting exemptions.(3) The department shall follow all applicable data-deidentification guidelines to prevent the reidentification of recipients described in this subdivision.(f) A recipient shall not be discontinued from the CalFresh program due to the able-bodied adult without dependents (ABAWD) work requirements under Public Law 119-21 in California before October 1, 2026, or until both of the following administrative activities are complete, whichever is later:(1) Completion of all automation essential to the initial implementation of the applicable SNAP-related provisions under Public Law 119-21. This process shall not preclude future additional automation and enhancements to streamline and support the ability of counties to support CalFresh applicants and recipients.(2) Completion of functionality in CalSAWS to support automated exemptions as identified by the state. This process shall not preclude future additional automation and enhancements to streamline and support the automated exemption processes.(g) (1) The department shall convene a working group to consider additional blanket exemptions to CalFresh work requirements for the population identified in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), including available data indicating participation in work or school, removing barriers to work or school, or having a documented medical condition. Data exploration may include, but is not limited to, the Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (CANS) assessment tool, the Independent Living Program, the Transitional Independent Living Plan, and Child and Family Team documentation.(2) If the working group determines that additional data are needed for the Child Welfare Services – California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES) to interface with CalSAWS to automate the exemptions, the department shall, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, report to the Legislature on the cost of any additional workload for county child welfare and eligibility agencies.(h) (1) The department, in collaboration with other departments and the California Health and Human Services Agency, as necessary, shall adopt, provide instructions to counties on, and automate for, blanket compliance with CalFresh work requirements, in accordance with federal law, for individuals participating in extended foster care and who have been determined to be working at least 80 hours per week pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be subject to subdivision (f) and shall be operative on the date when the department notifies the Legislature both that a process has been established to provide the data to CalSAWS and that the necessary changes have been automated to implement paragraph (1).SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 18926 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18926. (a) (1) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department shall annually seek a federal waiver of the existing federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program limitation that stipulates that an able-bodied adult without dependents (ABAWD) participant is limited to three months of CalFresh benefits in a three-year period unless that participant has met the work participation requirement or is otherwise exempt.(2) For purposes of this section, “ABAWD participant” includes a parent or other member of a household with responsibility for a dependent child 14 years of age or older as a result of federal House Resolution H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), signed by United States President Donald J. Trump on July 4, 2025.(b) All eligible counties shall be included in and bound by this waiver.(c) At its option, when a county is not eligible for a countywide waiver, a county may request that the department apply for the waiver described in subdivision (a) for one or more eligible subareas of the county. The department shall seek the subarea waiver within a reasonable timeframe following a request made by a county, and may seek any necessary information from the county to support the waiver request.SEC. 4.SEC. 5. Section 18926.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18926.1. (a) To the extent not prohibited by federal law and guidance, the department shall ensure that all recipients subject to the federal ABAWD time limit described in Section 18926 are permitted to meet the work requirements of the time limit through all forms of work, including, but not limited to, volunteer work at a nonprofit organization or a public institution that the recipient chooses, if the county can verify the hours of participation using the process established by the department pursuant to subdivision (b).(b) On or before January 1, 2018, the department, with input from the County Welfare Directors Association of California and advocates for CalFresh recipients, shall issue an all-county letter instructing counties as to how to verify hours of the volunteer work specified in subdivision (a).(c) (1) The department shall seek a waiver from the United States Department of Agriculture to protect the most vulnerable foster youth from experiencing hunger as a result of the cuts to their assistance resulting from federal House Resolution H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21), signed by United States President Donald J. Trump on July 4, 2025. The waiver shall request that foster youth and former foster youth 24 years of age or younger who were in foster care on the date of attaining 18 years of age or an older age be exempted from any cuts to their SNAP benefits as a result of the new SNAP time limit for this population as set forth in Public Law 119-21.(2) The department shall issue an all-county letter to implement the waiver within three months after receiving approval for the waiver submitted subject to paragraph (1) and, to the extent allowable under federal law and guidance or a waiver thereof, to instruct counties of steps that they may take to maximize the ability of foster youth participating in any of the following programs to be automatically deemed exempt from, or in compliance with, the ABAWD time limit described in Section 18926:(A) Transitional Independent Living Plan (TILP).(B) Guardian Scholars Program.(C) Foster Youth Success Initiative (FYSI).(D) Cooperating Agencies Foster Youth Educational Support (CAFYES), also known as NextUp.(E) Chafee Education and Training Voucher (ETV) Program.(F) Extended Foster Care.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. No appropriation pursuant to Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of this act.SEC. 6.SEC. 7. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.SEC. 8. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to prevent the immediate suffering of children, foster youth, and former foster youth, and the long-term harm caused to these populations by prolonged periods of hunger and other unmet needs, it is necessary that this act take effect immediately.